Ohio, session 136, SB14.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That section 5.57 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.57. The twenty-eighth day of September is designated as "Speaker Jo Ann Davidson Day" in recognition of Jo Ann Davidson, the first female speaker of the Ohio House of Representatives, who was born on that day in 1927. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________